zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼 > 水翼風翼零件: 水翼前翼; 箔片機身; 箔片桅桿; 箔片穩定器
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Windfoil > Windfoil Parçaları: Foil ön kanatları; Folyo Gövdeler; Folyo Direkler; Folyo Stabilizatörler
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Windfoiling > Windfoilonderdelen: Foil-voorvleugels; Foilrompen; Foilmasten; Foilstabilisatoren
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szélszörfözés > Szélszörfözési alkatrészek: Foil elülső szárnyak; Fóliatörzsek; Fóliaárbocok; Fóliastabilizátorok
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风帆冲浪 > 风帆冲浪部件: 水翼前翼; 水翼机身; 水翼桅杆; 水翼稳定器
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Jadranje s foilom > Deli za jadranje s foilom: Sprednje hidrokrilo; Trupi za folie; Jambori za foile; Stabilizatorji za foile
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Windfoil > Parti del windfoil: Ali anteriori per foil; Fusoliere del foil; Albero del foil; Stabilizzatori del foil
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Windfoiling > Piese pentru windfoiling: Aripi frontale pentru foil; Fuzelaje pentru folie; Catarge pentru folie; Stabilizatori pentru folie
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Windfoil > Pièces de windfoil: Ailes avant de foil; Fuselages de foil; Mâts à foil; Stabilisateurs de foil
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Windfoiling > Windfoil-deler: Frontvinger til foil; Foil-fuselage; Foilmaster; Foil-stabilisatorer
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván gió > Linh kiện lướt ván gió: Cánh trước cánh ngầm; Thân cánh ngầm; Cột cánh ngầm; Bộ thăng bằng cánh ngầm
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Windfoiling > Ανταλλακτικά Windfoil: Μπροστινά φτερά foil; Άτρακτοι Foil; Κατάρτια Foil; Σταθεροποιητές Foil
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Windfoiling > Ersatzteile für Windfoiling: Foil-Frontflügel; Windfoils-Fuselages; Masten für Windfoils; Windfoils-Stabilisatoren
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Windfoiling > Diely windfoilingu: Fóliové predné krídla; Fóliové trupy; Fóliové stožiare; Fóliové stabilizátory
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Windfoiling > Peças de windfoil: Asas frontais para foil; Fuselagens de foil; Mastros de foil; Estabilizadores de foil
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Windfoiling > Windfoil-delar: Foil-framvingar; Folie-flygkroppar; Foliemaster; Foliestabilisatorer
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Windfoiling > Windfoil – součásti: Přední foil křídla; Foil – fuselage; Foil – mast; Foil – zadní křídla
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วินด์ฟอยล์ > ชิ้นส่วนวินด์ฟอยล์: ปีกหน้าฟอยล์; ลำตัวฟอยล์; เสาฟอยล์; ฟอยล์สเตบิไลเซอร์
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Orlenčių sportas > Orlenčių sporto įrangos dalys: Foil priekiniai sparnai; Vandensparnio fiuzeliažai; Vandensparnių stiebai; Vandensparnio stabilizatoriai
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Windfoiling > Windfoil Parts: Foil Front Wings; Foil Fuselages; Foil Masts; Foil Stabilizers
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Siipilautailu > Siipilautailuosat: Foil-etusiivet; Foilien rungot; Foilien mastot; Foilien stabilisaattorit
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Windfoiling > Dele til windfoil: Foil-frontvinger; Folieskrog; Foliemaster; Foliestabilisatorer
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Виндфойлинг > Компоненты для виндфойлинга: Передние крылья гидрофойлов; Фюзеляжи для крыла; Мачты для крыла; Стабилизаторы для крыла
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウィンドフォイル > ウィングフォイルパーツ: フォイルフロントウィング; フォイル胴体; フォイルマスト; フォイル安定パーツ
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Windfoiling > Dijelovi opreme za windfoiling: Prednja krila za windfoiling; Trupovi za hidrokrila; Jarboli za hidrokrila; Stabilizatori za hidrokrila
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Windfoiling > Piezas de windfoil: Alas delanteras para foil; Fuselajes; Mástiles; Estabilizadores
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Windfoiling > Części do windfoila: Skrzydła przednie do foila; Fuselage do foila; Maszty do foila; Stabilizatory do foila
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윈드포일링 > 윈드포일 부품: 포일 프런트 윙; 포일 동체; 포일 마스트; 포일 스태빌라이저
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл > Части за уиндфойл: Предни крила за хидрофойл; Фюзелажи за фойл; Фойл мачти; Стабилизатори за фойл
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Windfoil > Peças de windfoil: Asas frontais para foil; Fuselagens de asas; Mastros de asa; Estabilizadores de asas